Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 2. Licenses, Permits, and Registrations.
Sec. 05.15.185.
Distribution of pull-tab games.

Each series of pull-tabs distributed in the state must be sealed and have a serial number label issued by the National Association of Fundraising Ticket Manufacturers or other serial number label approved by the department and may be distributed only to

a municipality or a qualified organization that has obtained a permit issued under this chapter;

an operator on behalf of an authorizing permittee; or

a distributor licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 22 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 29 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

Sec. 05.15.187.
Operation of pull-tab games.

A municipality or qualified organization may operate pull-tab games. Pull-tabs shall be obtained from a licensed distributor.

A pull-tab series may not be sold at more than one location during the same day.

Pull-tabs from different series may not be mixed or combined, unless 10 percent or less of a series remains unsold, in which case the remaining pull-tabs may be combined with a different series having an identical price and prize structure.

A pull-tab series may not be withdrawn from sale until all pull-tabs in the series are sold, except that a pull-tab series may be withdrawn from sale if a manufacturing defect exists in the series and the department is notified of the defect and of the withdrawal from sale within a period established by regulation by the department.

Pull-tabs may not be sold to a person under the age of 21 years. A person under the age of 21 years may not purchase a pull-tab.

Each permittee that had gross receipts exceeding $100,000 during the preceding year from activities conducted under this chapter or that is required to report under AS

05.15.080(a)

, that conducts a pull-tab game shall maintain records for two years of each prize of $50 or more, the first day and last day that each series was distributed, the serial number of each series, and the distributor from whom each series was purchased. In this section “permittee” includes municipalities and qualified organizations that jointly hold a multiple-beneficiary permit.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, a pull-tab game that confers an additional right upon all or some of the purchasers of a pull-tab series to participate in a lottery for additional prizes may not be conducted in the state unless a surety bond in the amount of $250,000 conditioned upon payment of all prizes and awards when due is submitted to the department by the operator or authorizing permittee and approved by the attorney general.

An owner, manager, or employee of a person holding a permit or license under this chapter, or registered under this chapter as a vendor, may not purchase a pull-tab from a pull-tab series manufactured, distributed, or sold by the permittee, licensee, or registered vendor.

A permittee, operator, or registered vendor may not turn over a prize of $50 or more to a person with a pull-tab card entitling the person to that prize unless the person signs a receipt for the prize and returns the receipt to the permittee, operator, or vendor. The receipt must be in a form approved by the department.

History.

(§ 22 ch 99 SLA 1988; am §§ 30 — 32 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For vendors, see 15 AAC 160, art. 3.

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Sale of pull-tabs in bars is legal but only if the pull-tabs are sold by a charitable gaming permittee and there has been compliance with all provisions of this title and former 15 AAC 105 (now see 15 AAC 160). November 6, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen. (rendered prior to enactment of this section).

Sec. 05.15.188.
Pull-tab sales by vendors on behalf of permittees; vendor registration.

A permittee may contract with a vendor to sell pull-tabs on behalf of the permittee if the permittee first registers the vendor with the department by applying for registration on a form prescribed by the department and by submitting the registration fee of $50 for each location at which the vendor will sell pull-tabs.

Upon approval of the vendor registration, the department shall issue an endorsement to the permittee’s permit that authorizes the conduct of pull-tab sales at that vendor location.

The endorsement issued under (b) of this section is an extension of the permittee’s privilege under AS

05.15.100

to conduct pull-tab sales in this state. A vendor may not sell a pull-tab series until a copy of the permit containing the endorsement for the new vendor location has been posted by the permittee in the registered vendor establishment. The endorsed permit must be clearly visible to the gaming public.

A separate endorsement shall be issued for each vendor location. The permittee shall inform the department when a vendor with whom the permittee is contracting changes the physical location at which pull-tabs are sold, and shall return to the department all copies of a permit endorsed to a vendor that is no longer selling pull-tabs on behalf of the permittee. Failure to inform the department of a change in vendor location, or to return the endorsed copies of a permit to the department after a vendor change, may constitute grounds for the suspension or revocation of a permittee’s permit.

At the time that a permittee annually renews its permit, it shall also renew the registration of all locations where a vendor is selling pull-tabs on the permittee’s behalf and shall pay a registration fee of $50 for each vendor location.

A permittee that uses a vendor to sell pull-tabs on its behalf shall enter into a written contract with that vendor. The department may inspect this contract. If the contract contains provisions that violate this chapter or the regulations adopted under it, the department may declare the contract void, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the vendor and the permit of the permittee.

A person, other than a permittee’s member-in-charge, may not directly supply a pull-tab series to a registered vendor for sale by that vendor on behalf of the permittee.

If a permittee contracts with a vendor under (a) of this section, the contract must provide that the permittee shall receive no less than 70 percent of the ideal net.

An amount equal to the ideal net less the compensation owed to the vendor shall be paid by the vendor to the member-in-charge upon delivery of a pull-tab series to the vendor for sale. The amount required to be paid by the vendor shall be paid by check and the check may not be drawn in a manner that the payee is not identified.

An operator may not contract with or use a vendor to sell pull-tabs.

A permittee may not contract with more than five vendors under this section.

History.

(§ 33 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For vendors, see 15 AAC 160, art. 3.

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A person who holds a charitable gaming operator’s license and owns a bar or liquor store may not use bar or liquor store employees and space to sell pull-tab games in that establishment without obtaining a vendor registration. Aug. 23, 2002 Op. Att’y Gen.

An operator of a liquor establishment might avoid the need for a vendor registration by renting pull-tab sales space in the liquor establishment and staffing the space with the operator’s employees, provided that the cost of rent is the only expense connected with the liquor establishment passed on to the charitable gaming permittees by the operator. Aug. 23, 2002 Op. Att’y Gen.

Secs. 05.15.190 — 05.15.198.
[Renumbered as AS 05.15.600 — 05.15.625.]

Secs. 05.15.200 — 05.15.210.
[Renumbered as AS 05.15.680 — 05.15.690.]